Utah statutes.
58-61-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Psychologist Licensing Board created in Section
58-61-201.
(2)  "Client" or "patient" means an individual who consults or is examined or
interviewed by a psychologist acting in his professional capacity.
(3)  "Confidential communication" means information, including information
obtained by the psychologist's examination of the client or patient, which is:
(a) (i)  transmitted between the client or patient and a psychologist in the
course of that relationship; or
(ii)  transmitted among the client or patient, the psychologist, and
individuals who are participating in the diagnosis or treatment under the
direction of the psychologist, including members of the client's or patient's
family; and
(b)  made in confidence, for the diagnosis or treatment of the client or
patient by the psychologist, and by a means not intended to be disclosed to
third persons other than those individuals:
(i)  present to further the interest of the client or patient in the
consultation, examination, or interview;
(ii)  reasonably necessary for the transmission of the communications; or
(iii)  participating in the diagnosis and treatment of the client or patient
under the direction of the psychologist.
(4)  "Hypnosis" means, regarding individuals exempted from licensure under
this chapter, a process by which one individual induces or assists another
individual into a hypnotic state without the use of drugs or other substances
and for the purpose of increasing motivation or to assist the individual to
alter lifestyles or habits.
(5)  "Individual" means a natural person.
(6)  "Mental health therapist" means an individual licensed under this title
as a:
(a)  physician and surgeon, or osteopathic physician engaged in the practice
of mental health therapy;
(b)  registered psychiatric mental health nurse specialist;
(c)  psychologist qualified to engage in the practice of mental health
therapy;
(d)  clinical social worker;
(e)  certified social worker;
(f)  marriage and family therapist; or
(g)  professional counselor.
(7)  "Mental illness" means a mental or emotional condition defined in an
approved diagnostic and statistical manual for mental disorders generally
recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under Subsection
(6).
(8)  "Practice of mental health therapy" means the treatment or prevention of
mental illness, including:
(a)  conducting a professional evaluation of an individual's condition of
mental health, mental illness, or emotional disorder;
(b)  establishing a diagnosis in accordance with established written standards
generally recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under
Subsection (6);
(c)  prescribing a plan for the prevention or treatment of a condition of
mental illness or emotional disorder; and
(d)  engaging in the conduct of professional intervention, including
psychotherapy by the application of established methods and procedures
generally recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under
Subsection (6).
(9) (a)  "Practice of psychology" includes:
(i)  the practice of mental health therapy by means of observation,
description, evaluation, interpretation, intervention, and treatment to effect
modification of human behavior by the application of generally recognized
professional psychological principles, methods, and procedures for the purpose
of preventing, treating, or eliminating mental or emotional illness or
dysfunction, the symptoms of any of these, or maladaptive behavior;
(ii)  the observation, description, evaluation, interpretation, or
modification of human behavior by the application of generally recognized
professional principles, methods, or procedures requiring the education,
training, and clinical experience of a psychologist, for the purpose of
assessing, diagnosing, preventing, or eliminating symptomatic, maladaptive, or
undesired behavior and of enhancing interpersonal relationships, work and life
adjustment, personal effectiveness, behavioral health, and mental health;
(iii)  psychological testing and the evaluation or assessment of personal
characteristics such as intelligence, personality, abilities, interests,
aptitudes, and neuropsychological functioning;
(iv)  counseling, marriage and family therapy, psychoanalysis, psychotherapy,
hypnosis, biofeedback, and behavior analysis and therapy;
(v)  diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders of disability,
alcoholism and substance abuse, disorders of habit or conduct, and the
psychological aspects of physical illness, accident, injury, or disability;
and
(vi)  psychoeducational evaluation, therapy, remediation, and consultation.
(b)  An individual practicing psychology may provide services to individuals,
couples, families, groups of individuals, members of the public, and
individuals or groups within organizations or institutions.
(10)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-61-501.
(11)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and
58-61-502, and may be further defined by division rule.
